test/src/dict-gt-yamls/V-mainsted_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Verb - mainsted: # Verb 'to tell' - full paradigm
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg1: mainstam
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg2: mainstak
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3: maainast
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl1: mainstep
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl2: mainsteʹped
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Pl3: mainste
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+Sg4: mainstet
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prs+ConNeg: maainâst

     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg1: mainstem
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg2: mainstiǩ
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg3: mainsti
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl1: mainstim
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl2: mainstid
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Pl3: mainste
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+Sg4: mainsteš
     mainsted+V+Ind+Prt+ConNeg: mainstam

     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg1: mainsteʹžem
     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg2: mainsteʹžiǩ
     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg3: mainstež
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl1: mainsteʹžep
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl2: mainsteʹžid
     mainsted+V+Pot+Pl3: mainsteʹže
     mainsted+V+Pot+Sg4: mainsteʹžet
     mainsted+V+Pot+ConNeg: mainsteʹže

     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg1: mainsteʹčem
     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg2: mainsteʹčiǩ
     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg3: mainsteʹči
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl1: mainsteʹčim
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl2: mainsteʹčid
     mainsted+V+Cond+Pl3: mainsteʹče
     mainsted+V+Cond+Sg4: mainsteʹčeš

     mainsted+V+Cond+ConNeg: mainsteʹče

     mainsted+V+Imprt+Sg2: maainâst
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Sg3: mainstââǥǥas
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl1: mainstâkap
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl2: mainsteʹǩed
     mainsted+V+Imprt+Pl3: mainstâkaz
     mainsted+V+Imprt+2+ConNeg: maainâst
     mainsted+V+Imprt+13+ConNeg: mainstuku
     mainsted+V+Actio+Ess: mainsteʹmen
     mainsted+V+Actio: mainstam
     mainsted+V+Act+PrsPrc: mainsteei
     mainsted+V+Act+PrfPrc: mainstam
     mainsted+V+Pass+PrfPrc: mainstummu
     mainsted+V+VAbess: mainsteǩâni

     mainsted+V+GerTemp: mainsteen
     mainsted+V+GerInstr: mainsteeʹl
